Utah statutes.
19-5-113.   Power of board to enter property for investigation -- Records
and reports required of owners or operators.
(1)  The board or its authorized representative has, after presentation of
credentials,  the  authority to enter at reasonable times upon any private or
public property for the purpose of:
(a)  sampling, inspecting, or investigating matters or conditions relating to
pollution or the possible pollution of any waters of the state, effluents or
effluent sources, monitoring equipment, or sewage sludge; and
(b)  reviewing and copying records required to be maintained under this
chapter.
(2) (a)  The board may require a person managing sewage sludge, or the owner
or operator of a disposal system, including a system discharging into publicly
owned treatment works, to:
(i)  establish and maintain reasonable records and make reports relating to
the operation of the system or the management of the sewage sludge;
(ii)  install, use, and maintain monitoring equipment or methods;
(iii)  sample, and analyze effluents or sewage sludges; and
(iv)  provide other information reasonably required.
(b)  The records, reports, and information shall be available to the public
except as provided in Subsection 19-1-306(2) or Subsections 63G-2-305(1) and
(2), Government Records Access and Management Act, as appropriate, for other
than effluent information.
